Hawaii statutes.
§806-41 Ownership, not necessary to allege
when. In any indictment for any of the following offenses it shall not be
necessary to allege that the instrument, document, article, or thing in respect
of which the offense is committed is the property of any person: the offense
of stealing any testamentary instrument; the offense of stealing any original
document of any court; the offense of stealing or of ripping, cutting,
severing, or breaking with intent to steal anything made of metal fixed in any
square or street, or in any place dedicated to public use or ornament. [L 1876,
c 40, §24; RL 1925, §4060; RL 1935, §5515; RL 1945, §10817; RL 1955, §258-27;
HRS §711-41; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next